Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

33-3-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Division" means the division of parks and wildlife.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 332, § 22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-3-10.

Editor's note:

Although § 62-3-10, currently 33-3-101, was added in 1972 as the last section appearing in article 3 of chapter 62, C.R.S. 1963, a supplement was not printed for the laws enacted in 1972 or 1973. This article was subsequently renumbered in the compilation of the Colorado Revised Statutes 1973.

33-3-102. State's liability for damage.

The state of Colorado is liable for certain damages caused by wildlife, but only to the extent provided in this article.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 408, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-3-1.

33-3-103. No liability for damage - when.

The state shall not be liable for:

Damage to livestock caused by coyotes, bobcats, or dogs. It is the intent of the general assembly that the division shall use whatever proper means are available to effectively minimize depredation to livestock by coyotes and bobcats.

Damage to motor vehicles caused by wildlife;

Injury to or the death of any person caused by wildlife;

Damages, if the division has furnished to the claimant sufficient and appropriate damage prevention materials and the claimant has refused to accept or use such materials exclusively for game damage prevention, and if the provisions of section 33-3-103.5 have been complied with by the division and the claimant;

Damages, if the claimant has willfully failed to maintain damage prevention materials throughout the normal life of such materials, and such materials have not been damaged or destroyed by wildlife;

Damages caused by wildlife if the claimant has unreasonably restricted hunting on land under his control or has unreasonably restricted passage to other land by restricting access across land under his control. In determining whether or not there has been an unreasonable restriction on hunting or availability of access by the claimant, the division shall consider only whether or not such restriction has significantly and adversely reduced a necessary harvest of wildlife.

Damages caused by wildlife, if claimant charges a fee in excess of five hundred dollars per person, per season, for the purpose of big game hunting access on or across claimant's property.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-024), ch. 323, p. 1723, § 1, effective June 1, 2009.)

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 409, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-3-2.

L. 77:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1525, § 10, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 79:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1214, § 9, effective June 21.

L. 90:

(2)(f) amended, p. 573, § 69, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1)(g) amended, p. 1439, § 1, effective April 20.

L. 2009:

(1)(d), (1)(g), and (2) amended, (SB 09-024), ch. 323, p. 1723, § 1, effective June 1.

33-3-103.5. Game damage prevention materials - definitions.

This section shall be applicable in determining the liability of the state under paragraph (e) of subsection (3) of this section and section 33-3-103 (1)(d) and (1)(e).

Every landowner shall be eligible to receive sufficient and appropriate temporary game damage prevention materials pursuant to this section.
(2) (a) (I) Every landowner shall be eligible to receive sufficient and appropriate temporary game damage prevention materials pursuant to this section.

Permanent game damage prevention materials shall be available only to a landowner who does not unreasonably restrict hunting of species likely to cause damage on land under the landowner's control or restrict the hunting of species likely to cause damage on any other lands by restricting access across lands under the landowner's control, and:

Who charges not more than five hundred dollars per person, per season, for big game hunting access on or across the landowner's property; or

Who charges a fee in excess of five hundred dollars per person, per season, for big game hunting access on or across the landowner's property, if the landowner has requested and been denied game damage prevention materials from the habitat partnership program created in section 33-1-110 (8) and the division determines that excessive game damage is occurring, and may continue to occur in the future.

The division shall not deny a landowner game damage claims or game damage prevention materials on the grounds that the landowner received a voucher pursuant to the wildlife conservation landowner hunting preference program for wildlife habitat improvement under section 33-4-103.

As used in this section:

"Temporary game damage prevention materials" means materials of an adequate substance that are utilized to protect private property for a period of time agreed upon by the landowner and the division. Such materials may include, but are not limited to, transferable panels or pyrotechnics.

"Permanent game damage prevention materials" means materials of an adequate substance that are erected in such a way to protect private property for the expected normal life of the materials. The normal life of the materials shall be as specified in a written agreement between the landowner and the division.

The division has the responsibility to supply useable, sufficient, and appropriate game damage prevention materials to a requesting landowner, and the landowner shall keep such materials in good repair throughout their normal life, if such materials have not been destroyed or damaged by wildlife.

The division shall respond to a landowner making an inquiry related to game damage within two business days after receiving the inquiry.

Within five business days after receiving a request for game damage prevention materials, the division shall consult with the landowner to discuss the sufficient and appropriate materials to prevent or mitigate the game damage. Temporary game damage prevention materials shall be delivered to the landowner within fifteen business days after the consultation, unless otherwise agreed to by the division and the landowner.

For a landowner eligible to receive permanent game damage prevention materials pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section, such materials shall be provided within forty-five days after the date that the landowner makes the initial request for the materials.

The division shall deliver game damage prevention materials to the specific site as directed by the landowner, if such delivery may be made by truck.

When agreed upon by the landowner, the division may construct permanent stackyards or orchard fencing in those areas of high wildlife damage potential within the limitations of appropriation by the general assembly for that purpose.

If the division does not provide game damage prevention materials within the amount of time established by paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), the division shall have the sole responsibility to supply and erect the damage prevention materials, and the state shall be liable for game damages incurred on and after the date by which the division should have provided the game damage prevention materials.

When erecting game damage prevention materials pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (e), the division may use division employees, individuals under contract to the division, or voluntary workers. If the division uses voluntary workers to assist in erecting game damage prevention materials, the division shall keep in force workers' compensation insurance as necessary to protect the landowner from liability resulting from injuries or death of said voluntary workers while engaged in the erection of such game damage prevention materials. If the division uses contract workers to assist in erecting game damage prevention materials as provided in this section, the division shall require the contractor to provide evidence of workers' compensation insurance as necessary to protect the landowner from liability resulting from injuries or death of said contract workers while engaged in the erection of such game damage prevention materials.

If the game damage prevention materials that the division provides to a landowner fail to prevent game damage due to insufficiency or inappropriateness of such materials, or if the division's insufficient or inappropriate erection of such materials fail to prevent game damage, the state shall be liable for damages caused by such materials or erection.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-024), ch. 323, p. 1724, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

(2)(a)(III) amended, (SB 13-188), ch. 244, p. 1182, § 2, effective August 7.

33-3-104. When state is liable - rules.

Subject to the limitations contained in sections 33-3-103 (1) and 33-3-103.5, and in part 2 of this article, the state shall be liable only for:

Damages to livestock or personal property used in the production of raw agricultural products, which under this article shall be no more than five thousand dollars per head of livestock injured or killed, caused by big game; except that damages to livestock shall be limited to physical trauma resulting in injury or death;

Damages to real or personal property, when such damages are caused by wildlife that is being moved or is otherwise under the direct control of division personnel at the time the damage occurs;

Damage to real or personal property caused by the use of damage prevention materials if the use of such materials or equipment is under the control of any personnel who are under the direction of division personnel at the time damage occurs;

Damages caused by those species of wildlife enumerated in section 33-1-102 (2) to orchards, nurseries, crops under cultivation, and harvested crops, damages to lawful fences as defined in section 35-46-101 (1), C.R.S., when such damages exceed ten percent of the value of the specific fence involved, and damages to livestock forage in excess of ten percent of historic use levels for privately owned and fenced ranch or farm units which are specifically limited to hay meadows, pasture meadows, artificially seeded rangelands, and grazing land which is deferred to seasonal uses. Damages to aftermath on alfalfa shall be paid to the full extent of such damages without regard to historic numbers of wildlife. Historic levels shall be designated by the claimant at the time of making a claim. Historic levels shall be expressed in average numbers of wildlife present on the property in question based on the twenty-year period ending January 1, 1973. If the division does not agree with the claimant on normal historic levels or any element of a damage settlement, the matter shall be submitted to arbitration within ten days of notice by either party. The arbitration panel shall consist of one arbitrator chosen by the landowner, one arbitrator chosen by the division, and one arbitrator chosen by the other two arbitrators. If the two arbitrators cannot agree within ten days on a third arbitrator, a request by either party shall be made to the district court for the judicial district of the county in which the damage is located for appointment of a third impartial arbitrator. The division and the landowner shall equally share the cost of the use of the third arbitrator. Historic levels or any element settled by arbitration may be included in an appeal to a court of competent jurisdiction, and the court shall not be bound by the finding of the arbitration panel.

Repealed.

The burden of proof shall be with the claimant for all claims for damages enumerated in paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of this section, pursuant to rules established by the commission pertaining to wildlife damage.

If the commission has not promulgated rules relating to damage by wildlife, pursuant to sections 33-1-104 and 33-1-108, the division shall not refuse to pay a claim for wildlife damage.

If for any reason a pertinent rule of the commission relating to wildlife damage is declared void or suspended, the provisions of subsection (4) of this section shall not be applicable.

For the year 1979, any damage claims received by the division after June 21, 1979, shall not be denied until and unless considered under the rules promulgated by the commission relating to damage by wildlife. If such rules are not promulgated by January 1, 1980, the provisions of subsection (4) of this section shall apply.

Repealed.

All rules concerning damages by wildlife adopted or amended by the commission on or after July 1, 1979, are subject to section 24-4-103.

Reimbursement for wildlife damages shall be reduced by the amount of claim awarded by an insurance company for the same damages.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 409, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-3-3.

L. 71:

p. 596, § 1.

L. 75:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1306, § 5, effective July 14.

L. 77:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1541, § 1, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 79:

(1)(d) R&RE and (2) to (8) added, p. 1216, § 10, effective June 21.

L. 80:

(8) amended, p. 789, § 26, effective June 5.

L. 81:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1654, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(2)(a) amended, p. 2051, § 20, effective October 14.

L. 84:

(1)(d) R&RE, (2) and (7) repealed, and (9) added, pp. 926, 927, §§ 1, 5, 2, effective May 2.

L. 85:

(1)(d) and (4) amended, p. 1364, § 31, effective June 28.

L. 93:

IP(1) and (1)(d) amended, p. 1720, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 2001:

(1)(a) amended, p. 409, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

IP(1) amended, (SB 09-024), ch. 323, p. 1726, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2022:

(8) amended, (SB 22-091), ch. 28, p. 169, § 10, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending the introductory portion to subsection (1) and subsection (1)(d), see section 1 of chapter 290, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

33-3-105. Wildlife migration areas - division to keep records.

It is the duty of the division to maintain records of areas used by wildlife for migration purposes, and the division shall furnish information concerning wildlife migration areas to persons requesting such information.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 410, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-3-4.

33-3-106. Excessive damage to property - permit to take wildlife - when - harassment by dogs.

Where wildlife is causing excessive damage to property, as determined by the division after consultation with the property owner, the division is authorized to issue a permit to the property owner, the property owner's designee, or to such other person selected by the division to kill a specified number of the species of wildlife causing such excessive damage. Upon request by the property owner, whenever the wildlife causing the excessive damage exceeds the wildlife objective set by the division for that species for that geographical area for the current year, the division is encouraged to issue a permit under this section. Any determination by the division that the damage being caused is not excessive may, upon application by the property owner, be reviewed by the commission.

No permit to take wildlife pursuant to this subsection (1) shall be issued or used in violation of any local restriction on firearm use.

Any wildlife killed, as permitted under subsection (1) of this section, shall remain the property of the state and shall be field dressed promptly, and such killing shall be reported to the division within forty-eight hours; except that the killing of a bear or mountain lion shall be reported within five days.

Nothing in this section shall make it unlawful to trap, kill, or otherwise dispose of bears, mountain lions, or dogs without a permit in situations when it is necessary to prevent them from inflicting death, damage, or injury to livestock, real property, a motor vehicle, or human life and additionally, in the case of dogs, when it is necessary to prevent them from inflicting death or injury to big game and to small game, birds, and mammals. Any wildlife killed as permitted under this subsection (3) shall remain the property of the state, and such killing shall be reported to the division within five days. The division may bring a civil action against the owner of any dog inflicting death or injury to any big game and to small game, birds, and mammals for the value of each game animal injured or killed. The minimum value of each animal shall be as set forth in section 33-6-110.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 1939, § 2, effective May 22, 2003.)

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 410, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-3-5.

L. 73:

p. 660, §§ 1, 2.

L. 75:

(3) amended, p. 1306, § 6, effective July 14.

L. 85:

(3) amended, p. 1364, § 32, effective June 28.

L. 2003:

(2) to (4) amended, p. 1939, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-024), ch. 323, p. 1727, § 4, effective June 1.

33-3-107. Claims procedure.

When any person has sustained damages to property caused by any wildlife, he shall notify the division of such damages within ten days after the discovery thereof. In the case of recurring damage, the division shall be notified within ten days after the discovery of each new or different occurrence of damage.

Proof of loss forms shall be filed within ninety days after the last notice of loss is submitted to the division under subsection (1) of this section. The division, within thirty days after the filing of such proof of loss forms, shall make an investigation of the alleged loss, and, where possible, shall attempt to reach an agreement with the claimant upon an amount of settlement. The commission may review settlement agreements between the division and the claimant and may disapprove any settlement which it finds to be unreasonable; but said review is not required in every case and the commission may determine that it will review only certain categories of settlements or that it will not review any settlements. The commission shall review all claims which the division recommends for denial and all claims upon which the division and claimant are unable to reach a settlement; except that a claimant whose claim is within the monetary jurisdictional limitations of the small claims division of county court may waive such review by the commission and commence an action which shall entitle such claimant to a trial de novo in the small claims division of the county court of the county in which the damage or any portion thereof is alleged to have occurred. Such waiver shall be in writing and shall be mailed to the commission within ten days after such claimant receives notification from the division of the denial of his claim, or within ten days after the claimant receives from the division an offer of settlement unacceptable to such claimant. The division may be represented by a full-time employee in small claims court.

(2.5) For payment to a claimant, the controller shall draw a warrant upon a voucher approved by the division and the state treasurer shall pay the amount of settlement out of the wildlife cash fund.

The division shall furnish forms to be used for the notice and proof of loss required under this section.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 410, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-3-6.

L. 91:

(2) amended and (2.5) added, p. 1439, § 2, effective April 20.

33-3-108. Review by the commission.

If the commission reviews a claim pursuant to the provisions of section 33-3-107, the commission may either confirm a decision of the division denying a claim or may extend to the claimant an offer of settlement. If the claimant disagrees with the commission's determination or refuses to accept the commission's offer of settlement, the claimant may file an action for damages in the district or county court of the judicial district or county in which the damage or any portion thereof is alleged to have occurred. Such action shall be filed within sixty days after the claimant receives notice of denial by the commission, which notice shall set forth the reasons for denial, or within sixty days after the claimant receives an offer of settlement from the commission. If the action is not filed within said sixty-day period, such action shall be forever barred.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 410, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-3-7.

L. 77:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1525, § 11, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 927, § 3, effective May 2.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1440, § 3, effective April 20.

33-3-109. Review by commission waived.

If a claimant waives the right to commission review pursuant to the provisions of section 33-3-107, such claimant may commence an action for damages and, in connection therewith, shall be entitled to a trial de novo in the small claims division of the county court of the county in which the damage or any portion thereof is alleged to have occurred. Such action shall be filed within sixty days after the claimant receives notice of denial by the division, which notice shall set forth the reasons for denial, or within sixty days after the claimant receives an offer of settlement from the division. If the action is not filed within said sixty-day period, such action shall be forever barred.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 411, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-3-8.

L. 77:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1525, § 12, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 927, § 4, effective May 2.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1440, § 4, effective April 20.

33-3-110. Payment of claim.

A certified copy of the judgment of the district or county court shall be forwarded to the division, and, in the event the judgment includes an award to the claimant, the controller is authorized to draw a warrant for the payment of the same upon a voucher approved by the division, and the state treasurer shall pay the same out of the wildlife cash fund.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 411, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 62-3-9.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1526, § 13, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1441, § 5, effective April 20.

33-3-111. Annual report to the general assembly.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), commencing with the second regular session of the sixty-seventh general assembly, the division shall report at least annually, by January 31 of each year, to the senate agriculture and natural resources committee and the house of representatives agriculture, livestock, and natural resources committee, or their successor committees, on game damage and game damage prevention issues. Such report shall include, at a minimum:

The herd management objectives set by the division and whether those objectives are being met. In providing this information, the division shall supply the actual number of herd animals by game unit.

If any of the herd management objectives of the division are not being met, the division shall set forth in detail its plans, strategies, and efforts that it is using or intends to use in order to achieve compliance with the objectives.

The number of requests for game damage prevention materials, the timeliness of the division in responding to such requests, the quantity and types of temporary and permanent materials issued, the number of requests for materials denied, and, to the extent that such information is available, the adequacy of materials in preventing game damage;

The number of permits to take wildlife requested pursuant to section 33-3-106, the number of permits issued, the amount of wildlife killed under such permits, the number of permits denied, and the reasons for denial;

The number of claims for damages submitted under this section, how many of those claims were settled and the monetary amounts of the settlements, the number of claims pending at the time of the report, the number of claims denied, and the reasons for denial;

Any other costs incurred by the division in administering this article.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-024), ch. 323, p. 1727, § 5, effective June 1.

L. 2017:

IP(1) amended, (HB 17-1257), ch. 254, p. 1064, § 5, effective August 9.